Oklahoma, session 2025, SB163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 109, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 24, O.S.L. 2024 (43 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 109), is amended to read as follows:


Section 109. A. In awarding the custody of a minor unmarried


child or in appointing a general guardian for the child, the court


shall consider what appears to be in the best interests of the


physical and mental and moral welfare of the child.


B. The court, pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of


this section, may grant the care, custody, and control of a child to


either parent or to the parents jointly.


For the purposes of this section, the terms joint custody and


joint care, custody, and control mean the sharing by parents in all

Req. No. 1096 Page 1


or some of the aspects of physical and legal care, custody, and


control of their children.


C. If either or both parents have requested joint custody, the


parents shall file with the court their plans for the exercise of


joint care, custody, and control of their child. The parents of the


child may submit a plan jointly, or either parent or both parents


may submit separate plans. Any plan shall include but is not


limited to provisions detailing the physical living arrangements for


the child, child support obligations, medical and dental care for


the child, school placement, and visitation rights. A plan shall be


accompanied by an affidavit signed by each parent stating that the


parent agrees to the plan and will abide by its terms. The plan and


affidavit shall be filed with the petition for a divorce or legal


separation or after the petition is filed.


D. The court shall issue a final plan for the exercise of joint


care, custody, and control of the child or children, based upon the


plan submitted by the parents, separate or jointly, with appropriate


changes deemed by the court to be in the best interests of the


child. The court also may reject a request for joint custody and


proceed as if the request for joint custody had not been made.


E. The parents having joint custody of the child may modify the


terms of the plan for joint care, custody, and control. The


modification to the plan shall be filed with the court and included


with the plan. If the court determines the modifications are in the

Req. No. 1096 Page 2


best interests of the child, the court shall approve the


modifications.


F. The court also may modify the terms of the plan for joint


care, custody, and control upon the request of one parent. The


court shall not modify the plan unless the modifications are in the


best interests of the child.


G. 1. The court may terminate a joint custody decree upon the


request of one or both of the parents or whenever the court


determines the decree is not in the best interests of the child.


2. Upon termination of a joint custody decree, the court shall


proceed and issue a modified decree for the care, custody, and


control of the child as if no such joint custody decree had been


made.


H. In the event of a dispute between the parents having joint


custody of a child as to the interpretation of a provision of the


plan, the court may appoint an arbitrator to resolve the dispute.


The arbitrator shall be a disinterested person knowledgeable in


domestic relations law and family counseling. The determination of


the arbitrator shall be final and binding on the parties to the


proceedings until further order of the court.


If a parent refuses to consent to arbitration, the court may


terminate the joint custody decree.


I. 1. In every proceeding in which there is a dispute as to


the custody of a minor child, a determination by the court that

Req. No. 1096 Page 3


child abuse, domestic violence, stalking, or harassment has occurred


raises a rebuttable presumption that sole custody, joint legal or


physical custody, or any shared parenting plan with the perpetrator


of child abuse, domestic violence, harassing or stalking behavior is


detrimental and not in the best interest of the child, and it is in


the best interest of the child to reside with the parent who is not


a perpetrator of child abuse, domestic violence, harassing or


stalking behavior.


2. For the purposes of this subsection:


a. “child abuse” shall have the same meaning as “abuse”


as defined pursuant to the Oklahoma Children’s Code in


Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. “coercive control” means unreasonably engaging in any


of the following conduct with a current or former


spouse, persons who are or were in an intimate partner


or dating relationship, or persons who are biological


parents of the same child:


(1) intentionally isolating the person from friends,


relatives, or other sources of support,


(2) depriving the person of basic necessities,


(3) controlling, regulating, or monitoring the


person’s movements, communications, daily


behavior, finances, economic resources, or access



Req. No. 1096 Page 4


to services, which includes stalking or


cyberstalking,


(4) compelling the person by force, threat, or


intimidation including, but not limited to,


threats based on actual or suspected immigration


status, to engage in conduct from which the


person has a right to abstain, or to abstain from


conduct that the person has a right to pursue,


(5) committing or threatening to commit cruelty to an


animal in a manner that intimidates the person,


(6) forced sex acts or threats of a sexual nature


including, but not limited to, threatened acts of


sexual conduct or threats to release sexual


images, or


(7) making demands on the person that limit free will


and lead to compliance,


c. “domestic violence” means the threat of the infliction


of physical injury, any act of physical harm or the


creation of a reasonable fear thereof, or the


intentional infliction of emotional distress by a


parent or a present or former member of the household


of the child, against the child or another member of


the household including coercive control as defined by


subparagraph b of this paragraph by a parent involving

Req. No. 1096 Page 5


physical, sexual, psychological, emotional, economic


or financial abuse,


c. d. “harassment” means a knowing and willful course or


pattern of conduct by a parent directed at another


parent which seriously alarms or is a nuisance to the


person, and which serves no legitimate purpose


including, but not limited to, harassing or obscene


telephone calls or conduct that would cause a


reasonable person to have a fear of death or bodily


injury, and


d. e. “stalking” means the willful course of conduct by a


parent who repeatedly follows or harasses another


person as defined in Section 1173 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


3. If a parent is absent or relocates as a result of an act of


domestic violence by the other parent, the absence or relocation


shall not be a factor that weighs against the parent in determining


custody or visitation.


4. The court shall consider, as a primary factor, the safety


and well-being of the child who is the victim of child abuse and of


the parent who is the victim of domestic violence, harassment, or


stalking behavior, in addition to other facts regarding the best


interest of the child.



Req. No. 1096 Page 6


5. The court shall consider the history of the parent causing


physical harm, bodily injury, assault, verbal threats, stalking, or


harassing behavior, or the fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or


assault to another person including the minor child, in determining


issues regarding custody and visitation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1096 TEK 12/30/2024 12:17:48 PM

































Req. No. 1096 Page 7